North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-5.
Benefits.

Service Retirement Benefits.

Any member may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution of and filing
thereof, he desires to be retired: Provided, that the said member at the time so specified for his retirement shall have attained the age of 60 years and have at least five years of membership service or shall have completed
30 years of creditable service.

(1a) Repealed by Session Laws 2014-88, s. 3(b), effective July 30, 2014.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1019, s. 1.

Any member who was in service October 8, 1981, who had attained 60 years of age, may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one
day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, he desires to be retired.

Any member who is a law-enforcement officer and who (i) attains age 50 and completes 15 or more years of creditable service in this capacity, (ii) attains age 55 and completes five or more years of creditable service in this capacity, or (iii) has completed
25 years of creditable service with a minimum of 15 years of creditable service in a law enforcement capacity may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting forth at what time,
as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, the member desires to be retired; Provided, also, any member who has met the conditions
herein required but does not retire, and later becomes a teacher or an employee other than as a law-enforcement officer shall continue to have the right to commence retirement.

(4a) Repealed by Session Laws 2014-88, s. 3(b), effective July 30, 2014.

Any member who is eligible for and is being paid a benefit under the Disability Income Plan as provided in

G.S. 135-105

or

G.S. 135-106

shall be deemed a member in service and may not retire under the provisions of this section. Any member who has made electronic submission or written application for long-term or extended short-term benefits
under the Disability Income Plan as provided in

G.S. 135-105

or

G.S. 135-106

, and who has been rejected by the Plan’s Medical Board for a long-term or extended short-term benefit shall have 90 days from the date of notification of the rejection to convert his application to an
early or service retirement application, provided that the member meets the eligibility requirements, effective the first day of the month following the month in which short-term disability benefits ended or the first day
of the month following the month in which any salary continuation as may be provided in

G.S. 135-104

ended, whichever is later.

(a1) Early Service Retirement Benefits. — Any member may retire and receive a reduced retirement allowance upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month,
not less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution of and filing thereof, he desires to be retired: Provided, that the said member at the time so specified for his retirement shall have attained
the age of 50 years and have at least 20 years of creditable service.

(a2) Repealed by Session Laws 2014-88, s. 3(c), effective July 30, 2014.

(a3) (Effective until July 1, 2022) Anti-Pension-Spiking Contribution-Based Benefit Cap. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary and except as provided for under this subsection, every service retirement allowance provided
under this section for members who retire on or after January 1, 2015, is subject to adjustment pursuant to a contribution-based benefit cap under this subsection. The Board of Trustees shall adopt a contribution-based
benefit cap factor recommended by the actuary, based upon actual experience, such that no more than three-quarters of one percent (0.75%) of retirement allowances are expected to be capped. The Board of Trustees shall
modify such factors every five years, as shall be deemed necessary, based upon the five-year experience study as required by G.S. 135-6(n). Prior to establishing a service retirement allowance under this section, the
Board shall do all of the following:

(1) Determine an amount equal to the member’s accumulated contributions as required under G.S. 135-8(b)(1) for all years during which the member earned membership service, other than service earned through armed service credit under

G.S. 135-4(f)

or

G.S. 135-4(g)

, used in the calculation of the retirement allowance that the member would receive under this section.

(2) Determine the amount of a single life annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the amount determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection, adjusted for the age of the member at the time of retirement or, when appropriate, the age at the time
of the member’s death.

(3) Multiply the annuity amount determined under subdivision (2) of this subsection by the contribution-based benefit cap factor.

(4) Determine the amount of the retirement allowance that results from the member’s membership service.The product of the multiplication in subdivision (3) of this subsection is the member’s contribution-based benefit cap. Except as provided in this subsection,
if the amount determined under subdivision (4) of this subsection exceeds the member’s contribution-based benefit cap, then the member’s retirement allowance shall be reduced by an amount equal to the difference between
the contribution-based benefit cap and the amount determined under subdivision (4) of this subsection.The retirement allowance of a member with an average final compensation of less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000), as hereinafter indexed, shall not be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap. The retirement allowance of a member with an average final compensation of more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000),
as hereinafter indexed, shall not be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap if the compensation was earned from multiple simultaneous employers, unless an employer’s share of the annualized average final compensation
exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), as hereinafter indexed. The minimum average final compensation necessary for a retirement allowance to be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap shall be increased
on January 1 each year by the percent change between the June Consumer Price Index in the year prior to retirement and the June Consumer Price Index in the fiscal year most recently ended, calculated to the nearest
tenth of a percent (0.1%), provided that this percent change is positive.If the retirement allowance of a member who became a member before January 1, 2015, or who has not earned at least five years of membership service
in the Retirement System after January 1, 2015, exceeds the member’s contribution-based benefit cap, then that member’s retirement allowance shall not be reduced; however, an additional contribution, as calculated under
G.S. 135-4(jj) and in accordance with G.S. 135-8(f)(2)f., shall be required. This additional contribution shall be required from the following: (i) if the member’s annualized final compensation from the member’s last
employer is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, as indexed under this section, then the additional contribution shall be required from the member’s last employer; (ii) if the member’s annualized final compensation
from the member’s last employer is less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), as indexed under this section, and if the member was not eligible to retire with an unreduced benefit at the time of hire by the
last employer, then the additional contribution shall be required from the member’s last employer; (iii) if the member’s annualized final compensation from the member’s last employer is less than one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000), as indexed under this section, and if the member was eligible to retire with an unreduced benefit at the time of hire by that last employer, then the additional contribution shall be required from
the most recent employer from which the member earned an annualized final compensation of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, as indexed under this section.

(a3) (Effective July 1, 2022) Anti-Pension-Spiking Contribution-Based Benefit Cap. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, every service retirement allowance provided under this section for members who retire on or after January 1, 2015,
is subject to adjustment pursuant to a contribution-based benefit cap under this subsection. The Board of Trustees shall adopt a contribution-based benefit cap factor recommended by the actuary, based upon actual experience,
such that no more than three-quarters of one percent (0.75%) of retirement allowances are expected to be capped. The Board of Trustees shall modify such factors every five years, as shall be deemed necessary, based
upon the five-year experience study as required by G.S. 135-6(n). Prior to establishing a service retirement allowance under this section, the Board shall:

(1) Determine an amount equal to the member’s accumulated contributions as required under G.S. 135-8(b)(1) for all years during which the member earned membership service, other than service earned through armed service credit under

G.S. 135-4(f)

or

G.S. 135-4(g)

, used in the calculation of the retirement allowance that the member would receive under this section.

(2) Determine the amount of a single life annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the amount determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection, adjusted for the age of the member at the time of retirement or, when appropriate, the age at the time
of the member’s death.

(3) Multiply the annuity amount determined under subdivision (2) of this subsection by the contribution-based benefit cap factor.

(4) Determine the amount of the retirement allowance that results from the member’s membership service, to which the member would be entitled but for the adjustment under this subsection. The amount shall be calculated in the same manner as the member’s
service retirement allowance, with the following exceptions: The applicable percentage of the member’s average final compensation shall be multiplied by the number of years of membership service, rather than the number
of years of creditable service; the amount shall include the effect of any percentage reduction that applies to the member’s service retirement allowance by virtue of the member’s age or amount of creditable service
as of the service retirement date; and the amount shall not be adjusted for an optional allowance elected under subsection (g) of this section.The product of the multiplication in subdivision (3) of this subsection
is the member’s contribution-based benefit cap. If the amount determined under subdivision (4) of this subsection exceeds the member’s contribution-based benefit cap, the member’s retirement allowance shall be reduced
by an amount equal to the difference between the contribution-based benefit cap and the amount determined under subdivision (4) of this subsection.Notwithstanding the foregoing, the retirement allowance of a member
with an average final compensation of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), as hereinafter indexed, shall not be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap. The minimum average final compensation necessary
for a retirement allowance to be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap shall be increased on January 1 each year by the percent change between the June Consumer Price Index in the year prior to retirement and
the June Consumer Price Index in the fiscal year most recently ended, calculated to the nearest tenth of a percent (0.1%), provided that this percent change is positive.Notwithstanding the foregoing, the retirement
allowance of a member who became a member before January 1, 2015, or who has not earned at least five years of membership service in the Retirement System after January 1, 2015, shall not be reduced; however, the member’s
last employer, or if the member’s last employer did not report to the retirement system any compensation paid to the member during the period used to compute the member’s average final compensation, the member’s employer
or employers who reported compensation to the member during such period, shall be required to make an additional contribution as specified in G.S. 135-8(f)(2)f., if applicable.

Service Retirement Allowances of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1959, but prior to July 1, 1963. — Upon retirement from service on or after July 1, 1959, but prior to July 1, 1963, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance which shall
consist of:

An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his accumulated contributions at the time of his retirement; and

A pension equal to the annuity allowable at the age of 65 years or at his retirement age, whichever is the earlier age, computed on the basis of contributions made prior to such earlier age; and

If he has a prior service certificate in full force and effect, an additional pension which shall be equal to the sum of:

The annuity which would have been provided at his retirement age by the contributions which he would have made during such prior service had the System been in operation and had he contributed thereunder at the rate of six and twenty-five hundredths per
centum (6.25%) of his compensation; and

The pension which would have been provided on account of such contributions at age 65, or at his retirement age, whichever is the earlier age.If the member has not less than 20 years of creditable service, he shall be entitled to a total retirement allowance
of not less than seventy dollars ($70.00) per month; provided that the computation shall be made prior to any reduction resulting from the selection of an optional allowance as provided by subsection (g) of this
section.

(b1)

Service Retirement Allowances of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1963, but prior to July 1, 1967. —
Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1963, but prior to July 1, 1967, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as
follows:

(1)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, such allowance shall be equal to the sum of (i) one percent (1%) of the portion of his average final compensation
not in excess of forty-eight hundred dollars ($4,800) plus one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of forty-eight hundred dollars ($4,800), multiplied by the number of
years of his creditable service rendered prior to January 1, 1966, and (ii) one percent (1%) of the portion of his average final compensation not in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600) plus one and
one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600), multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered after January 1, 1966.

(2)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-fifth birthday, his service retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by five twelfths of one
percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(3)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b2)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1967, but prior to July 1, 1969. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1967, but prior to July 1, 1969, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, such allowance shall be equal to one and one-quarter percent (11/4%) of the portion of his average final
compensation not in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600) plus one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600), multiplied by the number
of years of his creditable service.

(2)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-fifth birthday, his service retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one third of one percent
(1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(3)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b3)

Service Retirement Allowances of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1969, but prior to July 1, 1973. —
Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1969, but prior to July 1, 1973, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as
follows:

(1)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or on or after his sixty-second birthday and the completion
of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and one-quarter percent (11/4%) of the portion of his average final compensation not in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600) plus
one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600), multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be
computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following
his sixty-fifth birthday.

(3)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-second birthday but on or after his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall
be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following
his sixty-second birthday.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b4)

Service Retirement Allowances of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1973, but prior to July 1, 1975. —
Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1973, but prior to July 1, 1975, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance
shall be equal to one and one-quarter percent (11/4%) of the portion of his average final compensation not in excess of five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600) plus one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion
of such compensation in excess of five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600), multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be computed
as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth
birthday.

(3)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b5)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1975, but prior to July 1, 1977. —
Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1975, but prior to July 1, 1977, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance
shall be equal to one and one-half percent (11/2%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1)
above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(3)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b6)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1977, but prior to July 1, 1980. —
Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1977, but prior to July 1, 1980, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance
shall be equal to one and fifty-five one hundredths percent (1.55%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2a)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his sixtieth and before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall
be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his
sixty-fifth birthday.

(2b)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial
equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2a) above.

(3)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b7)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1980, but prior to July 1, 1985. —
Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1980, but prior to July 1, 1985, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and fifty-seven hundredths
percent (1.57%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his sixtieth and before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall
be computed as in (1) above but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his
sixty-fifth birthday.

(3)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial
equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2) above.

(4)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b8)

Service Retirement Allowance of Law-Enforcement Officers Retiring on or after January 1, 1985 [on or after January 1, 1985, but prior to July 1, 1985]. —
Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, on or after January 1, 1985 [on or after January 1, 1985, but prior to July 1, 1985], a member who is a law-enforcement
officer or an eligible former law-enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law-enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable
service, the allowance shall be equal to one and fifty-seven one hundredths percent (1.57%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2)
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 50th and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law-enforcement officer and prior to his completion of 30 years
of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first
day of the month coincident with or next following his 55th birthday.

(b9)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1985, but before July 1, 1988. —
Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1985, but before July 1, 1988, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law-enforcement officer or an eligible former law-enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law-enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one
and fifty-eight one hundredths percent (1.58%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 50th and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law-enforcement officer and prior to his completion of 30 years of creditable service, his retirement allowance
shall be computed as in a. above, but shall be reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following
his 55th birthday.

(2)
A member who is not a law-enforcement officer or an eligible former law-enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of
25 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and fifty-eight hundredths percent (1.58%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 60th and before his 65th birthday and prior to his completion of 25 or more years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall
be computed as in a. above but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following
his 65th birthday.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his 60th birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60
years as computed in b. above.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b10)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1988, but before July 1, 1989. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1988, but before July 1, 1989, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years
of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty hundredths percent (1.60%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 135-5(b9)(1)b.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service
or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and sixty hundredths percent (1.60%) of his average final compensation, multiplied
by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 135-5(b9)(2)b, c and d.

(b11)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1989, but before July 1, 1990. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1989, but before July 1, 1990, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years
of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-three hundredths percent (1.63%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 135-5(b9)(1)b.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service
or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-three hundredths percent (1.63%) of his average final compensation, multiplied
by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 135-5(b9)(2)b, c and d.

(b12)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 1992. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 1992, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years
of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-four hundredths percent (1.64%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 135-5(b9)(1)b.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service
or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-four hundredths percent (1.64%) of his average final compensation, multiplied
by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 135-5(b9)(2)b, c and d.

(b13)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1992, but before July 1, 1993. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1992, but before July 1, 1993, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years
of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy hundredths percent (1.70%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 135-5(b9)(1)b.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service
or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy hundredths percent (1.70%) of his average final compensation, multiplied
by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 135-5(b9)(2)b., c., and d.

(b14)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1993, but before July 1, 1994. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1993, but before July 1, 1994, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years
of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-one hundredths percent (1.71%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 50th and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer and prior to the completion
of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be computed as in G.S. 135-5(b14)(1)a., but shall be reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the retirement date
precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his 55th birthday.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service
or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-one hundredths percent (1.71%) of his average final compensation, multiplied
by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 60th birthday and before his 65th birthday and prior to the completion of 25 years or more of creditable service, the retirement allowance
shall be computed as in G.S. 135-5(b14)(2)a. but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident
with or next following his 65th birthday.

c.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his 60th birthday and prior to the completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, the service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial
equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in G.S. 135-5(b14)(2)b.

d.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b15)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1994, but before July 1, 1995. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) above, on or after July 1, 1994, but before July 1, 1995, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years
of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-three hundredths percent (1.73%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer and prior to